Utah statutes.
78B-14-318 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Assistance with discovery.

A tribunal of this state may:

(1)  request a tribunal of another state to assist in obtaining discovery; and

(2)  upon request, compel a person over whom it has jurisdiction to respond to a discovery order issued by a tribunal of another state.

